Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 14 Inactive Records

8-14-1.
Management, storage, and disposition of state court records.

There shall be created a committee within the state court system with responsibility for the management, storage, and disposition of all state court records, including inactive records. The committee shall be composed of the following members: the chief justice of the supreme court or his or her designee, the presiding justice of the superior court or his or her designee, the chief judge of the family court or his or her designee, the chief judge of the district court or his or her designee, the chief judge of the workers’ compensation court or his or her designee, the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal or his or her designee, one clerk from each of the respective state courts as designated by the chief or presiding justice or chief judge of each state court, and the head of the state court record center or his or her designee. The committee shall meet as required to revise the state courts’ records retention policy or at the request of the state court administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 203, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 311, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 473, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 6.

8-14-2.
Attorney records.

After a period of seven (7) years or more has lapsed since the disposition of a civil case or matter, an attorney may destroy his or her records relative to the case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 203, § 4.

8-14-3 — 8-14-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1957, ch. 21, §§ 3, 4; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 6; P.L. 1985, ch. 338, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 203, § 3, effective July 9, 1990. For present similar provisions see this chapter.